Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6884HV (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2653 Section 1. Section 321.210, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (4) Has unlawfully or fraudulently used or permitted an 3 unlawful or fraudulent use of the a license. 4 Sec. 2. Section 321.212, subsection 1, paragraph a, 5 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 (2) A suspension The department shall suspend a license for 7 thirty days under section 321.210, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , 8 subparagraph (4), for a violation of section 321.216, 321.216A, 9 321.216B shall not exceed six months , or 321.216C . As soon as 10 practicable after the period of suspension has expired, but 11 not later than six months after the date of expiration, the 12 department shall expunge information regarding the suspension 13 from the personâs driving record if the suspension was for a 14 violation of section 321.216B or 321.216C . 15 Sec. 3. Section 321.215, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 b. However, a temporary restricted license shall not be 18 issued to a person whose license is revoked pursuant to a court 19 order issued under section 321.209, subsections 1 through 5 ; to 20 a juvenile whose license has been suspended or revoked pursuant 21 to a dispositional order under section 232.52, subsection 2 , 22 paragraph âaâ , for a violation of chapter 124 or 453B or section 23 126.3 ; to a person whose license has been suspended pursuant to 24 section 321.210, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4); 25 to a juvenile whose license has been suspended under section 26 321.213B ; or to a person whose license has been suspended 27 pursuant to a court order under section 714.7D . A temporary 28 restricted license may be issued to a person whose license is 29 revoked under section 321.209, subsection 6 , only if the person 30 has no previous drag racing convictions. A person holding a 31 temporary restricted license issued by the department under 32 this section shall not operate a motor vehicle for pleasure. 33 Sec. 4. Section 321.215, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 34 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -1- LSB 6884HV (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2653 Upon conviction and the suspension or revocation of a 1 personâs noncommercial driverâs license under section 321.209, 2 subsection 5, 6, or 7, or section 321.210, subsection 1, 3 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (6), or (7), or 4 section 321.210A , or 321.513 ; or upon the denial of issuance 5 of a noncommercial driverâs license under section 321.560 , 6 based solely on offenses enumerated in section 321.555, 7 subsection 1 , paragraph âcâ , or section 321.555, subsection 8 2 ; or upon suspension or revocation of a juvenileâs driverâs 9 license pursuant to a dispositional order under section 232.52, 10 subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , for a violation of chapter 124 11 or 453B , or section 126.3 ; or upon suspension of a driverâs 12 license pursuant to a court order under section 714.7D , the 13 person may apply to the department for a temporary restricted 14 license to operate a motor vehicle for the limited purpose or 15 purposes specified in subsection 1 . The application may be 16 granted only if all of the following criteria are satisfied: 17 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to driverâs license 18 suspensions for the unlawful or fraudulent use of a driverâs 19 license on or after July 1, 2027. 20